Utah statutes.
17-28-5.   Appointment of county fire department personnel -- Volunteers.
(1) (a)  Except for the chief and deputy chief of a county fire department,
all firefighter positions in county fire departments shall be filled by
persons appointed from a certified county fire civil service register.
(b)  County fire civil service registers for employment and promotion shall be
prepared by the County Fire Civil Service executive director according to the
requirements of this chapter and civil service rules.
(2) (a)  The chief and the deputy chief of any county fire department may be
appointed from either the certified county fire civil service register or from
qualified applicants outside of the county civil service system.
(b)  The positions of chief and deputy chief are exempt from civil service
status.
(c)  A chief or deputy chief who is appointed from the certified county fire
civil service register shall be returned to the civil service status that he
held before his appointment after his appointment expires or terminates.
(3) (a)  All persons employed as firefighters, emergency medical technicians,
or a combination of firefighter and emergency medical technician, shall be
subject to the provisions of this chapter and shall be members of the County
Fire Civil Service System.
(b)  Other fire department employees who do not provide firefighter services
are not considered subject to this chapter and shall be covered by the
countywide merit system.
(4) (a)  A volunteer firefighter or paid-call firefighter is not subject to
this chapter and is not a merit employee subject to the County Fire Civil
Service System.
(b) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b)(ii), a volunteer or paid-call
firefighter may not work more than 1,040 hours per calendar year.
(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(b)(i), a wildland firefighter may work
more than 1,040 hours per calendar year if approved by the county legislative
body.
(iii)  For purposes of this Subsection (4)(b), "wildland firefighter" means a
seasonally employed firefighter who does not receive the same employment
benefits as a full-time employee and who is hired to suppress wildland fires
in areas outside of inhabited, urban areas.
